incubator/apertium-liv-fin/apertium-liv-fin.liv.lexc
LEXICON PROP_ĀNKAŖ !!= @CODE@ ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_VIRPÕĻ !!= @CODE@ virpõļ:virpõļ 241
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON PROP_ǬʼBIĻ !!= @CODE@ ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
%<n%>%<prop%>:	CASES	;





! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Quantifier inflection
!! ----------------------
!! Livonian quantifiers inflect in the same cases as other
!! nominals.

LEXICON QntTag
	QntCases	;

LEXICON QntCases
%<qnt%>:   CASES  ;
!        -    Nouns  ;

LEXICON QNT_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
%<qnt%>:     CASES   ;

!! !! Stem lexica
LEXICON NUM_PADĀ !!= @CODE@ padā:padā 39
%<num%>:	NMN_PADĀ	;

LEXICON NUM_KĒRA !!= @CODE@ kēra:kēra 43
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_OKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 68
%<num%>:	CASES	;


LEXICON NUM_VAʼG !!= @CODE@ vaʼg:vag 72
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_KUʼŽ !!= @CODE@ kuʼž:kuž 89
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_RUZŪ !!= @CODE@ : 90
%<num%>:	CASES	;

!!= @CODE@ : 118
LEXICON NUM_SIELDÕ
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_NǬʼGÕ !!= @CODE@ nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_IRM !!= @CODE@ irm: 125
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_KIM !!= @CODE@ : 126
%<num%>:	CASES	;


LEXICON NUM_FAKT !!= @CODE@ fakt: 135
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_ĀIGAST !!= @CODE@ āigast: 140
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_VĪDÕZ !!= @CODE@ vīdõz: 163
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_TUOISTÕNZ !!= @CODE@ : 164
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ !!= @CODE@ ī'dõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165
%<num%>:	CASES	;


LEXICON NUM_NAI !!= @CODE@ nai: 191
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_TŪĻI !!= @CODE@ tūļi: 199
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_SĒMI !!= @CODE@ sēmi: 201
%<num%>:	CASES	;


LEXICON NUM_ÄʼBȚÕKS !!= @CODE@ ä'bțõks:äbțõks 208
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_TŪĻ !!= @CODE@ : 214
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_PŪOL !!= @CODE@ : 216
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_ĪKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 217
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_KAKŠ !!= @CODE@ : 218
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_ŪŽ !!= @CODE@ : 219
%<num%>:	CASES	;

LEXICON NUM_APPÕN !!= @CODE@ appõn:appõn 235
%<num%>:	CASES	;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:

!! Verb inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language verbs inflect in persons.

LEXICON TV_
!! CONJUGATION TYPE MISSING
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ
!! 1 lǟʼdõ:
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_LǞʼDÕ
!! 1 lǟʼdõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_TǬʼDÕ
!! 2 tǭʼdõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_TǬʼDÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:vī
%<v%>%<aux%>: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VĪDÕ
!! 3 vīdõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_VĪDÕ ;

LEXICON IV_NǞʼDÕ
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_NǞʼDÕ
!! 4 nǟʼdõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_KǞʼDÕ
!! 5 kǟʼdõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_TĪʼEDÕ
!! 6 tīʼedõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;



LEXICON V-AUX_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_SĪEDÕ
!! 7 sīedõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sǭdõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sǭdõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_SǬDÕ
!! 8 sīedõ:
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_JŪODÕ
!! 9 jūodõ:
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JŪODÕ
!! 9 jūodõ:
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JŪODÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_VȰLDA
!! 10 vȱlda:
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_VȰLDA
!! 10 vȱlda:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_TŪLDA
!! 11 tūlda:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON V-AUX_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
%<v%>%<aux%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
%<v%>%<iv%>: K ;

LEXICON TV_PĀNDA
!! 12 pānda:
%<v%>%<tv%>: K ;

LEXICON IV_JEʼLLÕ
!! 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼlā
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_JEʼLLÕ
!! 13 jeʼllõ:jeʼlā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ASTÕ
!! 18 astõ:astā
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ASTÕ
!! 18 astõ:astā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VÕTTÕ
!! 19 võttõ:võtā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VIEʼDDÕ
!! 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼdā
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_VIEʼDDÕ
!! 24 vieʼddõ:vieʼdā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MAKSÕ
!! 25 maksõ:maksā
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MAKSÕ
!! 25 maksõ:maksā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TAPPÕ
!! 26 tappõ:tapā
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_JEʼLLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MÄNGÕ
!! 14 mängõ:mǟnga
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KILLÕ
!! 15 killõ:kīla
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PALLÕ
!! 16 pallõ:pǭla
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LOULÕ
!! 17 loulõ:lōla
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LAITÕ
!! 20 laittõ:lāita
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LAITÕ
!! 20 laittõ:lāita
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TÄUTÕ
!! 21 täutõ:tǟta
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TÄUTÕ
!! 21 täutõ:tǟta
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_PȮĻTÕ
!! 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_PȮĻTÕ
!! 22 pȯļtõ:pūoļta
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MȮISTÕ
!! 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MȮISTÕ
!! 23 mȯistõ:mūošta
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ANDÕ
!! 27 andõ:ānda
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ANDÕ
!! 27 andõ:ānda
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_TIEUDÕ
!! 28 tieudõ:tīeda
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_TIEUDÕ
!! 28 tieudõ:tīeda
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_MÄNGÕ ;

!! 29-48 follow same pattern
LEXICON IV_LUʼGGÕ
!! luʼggõ:lugū 29
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LUʼGGÕ
!! luʼggõ:lugū 29
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_MUʼDŽÕ
!! muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_MUʼDŽÕ
!! muʼdžõ:mudžū 30
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_VAKȚÕ
!! vakțõ:vakțū 31
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ      ;

LEXICON TV_VAKȚÕ
!! vakțõ:vakțū 31
%<v%>%<tv%>:	V-01_LUʼGGÕ	;

LEXICON IV_KITTÕ
!! kittõ:kitū 32
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KITTÕ
!! kittõ:kitū 32
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
%<v%>%<aux%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_RIʼDDÕ
!! riʼddõ:ridū 33
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_KUTSÕ
!! kutsõ:kutsū 34
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUTSÕ
!! kutsõ:kutsū 34
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON V-AUX_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
%<v%>%<aux%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_LASKÕ
!! laskõ:laskū 35
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AKKÕ
!! akkõ:akū 36
!! Should ss be s and šš be š? 2013-02-19
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AKKÕ
!! akkõ:akū 36
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_LUʼGGÕ ;


LEXICON V-AUX_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
%<v%>%<aux%>:	V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
%<v%>%<iv%>:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AIGÕ
!! aigõ:āigõ 37
%<v%>%<tv%>:  V-01_AIGÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KUOŖŖÕ
!! kuoŗŗõ:kūoŗõ 38
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_VANNÕ
!! vannõ:vǭnõ 39
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_PȮĻĻÕ
!! pȯļļõ:pūoļõ 40
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_PȮIMÕ
!! pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_PȮIMÕ
!! pȯimõ:pūoimõ 41
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_OUŖÕ
!! ouŗõ:ōŗõ 42
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_KEIJÕ
!! keijõ:kējõ 43
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_KEIJÕ
!! keijõ:kējõ 43
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;


LEXICON IV_AŖŠTÕ
!! aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
%<v%>%<iv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_AŖŠTÕ
!! aŗštõ:āŗštõ 44
%<v%>%<tv%>:	V-01_AIGÕ	;

LEXICON TV_PȮRTÕ
!! pȯrtõ:pūortõ 45
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_OUTÕ
!! outõ:ōtõ 46
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON V-AUX_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
%<v%>%<aux%>:    V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON IV_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
%<v%>%<iv%>:	V-01_AIGÕ	;

LEXICON TV_TUNDÕ
!! tundõ:tūndõ 47
%<v%>%<tv%>:     V-01_AIGÕ       ;

LEXICON TV_OUDÕ
!! oudõ:ōdõ 48
%<v%>%<tv%>:	V-01_AIGÕ	;


LEXICON IV_KŪLÕ
!! kūlõ:kūlõ 49
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_KŪLÕ
!! kūlõ:kūlõ 49
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_ARRÕ
!! arrõ:arrõ 50
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_ARRÕ
!! arrõ:arrõ 50
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON IV_AʼILÕ
!! aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
%<v%>%<iv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_AʼILÕ
!! aʼilõ:aʼilõ 51
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON TV_SVAʼRRÕ
!! svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ 52
%<v%>%<tv%>: V-01_KŪLÕ ;

LEXICON quantifiers
dutš:dutš NUM_OKŠ   ; !"XX"
eʼžmi:eʼžmi NUM_SĒMI   ; !"XX"
ikš:ikš NUM_ĪKŠ   ; !"yksi"
kakš:kakš NUM_KAKŠ   ; !"kaksi"
kim:kim NUM_KIM   ; !"kymmenen"
kǭʼdõks:kǭʼdõks NUM_ÄʼBȚÕKS   ; !"XX"
kūdõz:kūdõz NUM_VĪDÕZ   ; !"XX"
kuolm:kuolm NUM_IRM   ; !"kolme"
miljon:miljon NUM_ĀIGAST   ; !"XX"
nēļa:nēļa NUM_KĒRA   ; !"neljä"
nēļasadā:nēļa#sadā NUM_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
neļļõzjaʼg:neļļõz#jaʼg NUM_VAʼG   ; !"XX"
neļļõzjagū:neļļõz#jagū NUM_RUZŪ   ; !"XX"
pūol:pūol NUM_PŪOL   ; !"XX"
pūoļ:pūoļ NUM_TŪĻ   ; !"XX"
sadā:sadā NUM_PADĀ   ; !"XX"
sadāz:sadāz NUM_VĪDÕZ   ; !"XX"
seis:seis NUM_FAKT   ; !"seitsemän"
īʼdõks:īʼdõks QntTag   ; !"yhdeksän"
kǭʼdõks:kǭʼdõks QntTag   ; !"kahdeksan"
seiskimdõ:seis#kimdõ NUM_SIELDÕ   ; !"XX"
seismi:seismi NUM_TŪĻI   ; !"XX"
seismõztuoistõnz:seismõz#tuoistõnz NUM_TUOISTÕNZ   ; !"XX"
seistuoistõn:seis#tuoistõn NUM_APPÕN   ; !"XX"
tuoi:tuoi NUM_NAI   ; !"toinen"
tūʼontõ:tūʼontõ NUM_NǬʼGÕ   ; !"XX"
tūʼontõz:tūʼontõz NUM_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ   ; !"XX"
vīž:vīž NUM_ŪŽ   ; !"viisi"
LEXICON verbs
eitõ:eitõ IV_TÄUTÕ   ; !"heittäytyä"
gaʼḑḑõ:gaʼḑḑõ V-AUX_RIʼDDÕ   ; !"sattua"
joudõ:joudõ IV_TIEUDÕ   ; !"joutua"
keijõ:keijõ TV_KEIJÕ   ; !"tahkoa"
killõ:killõ TV_KILLÕ   ; !"kylvää"
kuostõ:kuostõ IV_ASTÕ   ; !"vastata"
kuʼddõ:kuʼddõ IV_RIʼDDÕ   ; !"tehdä kennoja"
kǟʼdõ:kǟʼdõ IV_KǞʼDÕ   ; !"käydä"
loulõ:loulõ TV_LOULÕ   ; !"laulaa"
läppõ:läppõ IV_AKKÕ   ; !"ummehtua"
lǟʼdõ:lǟʼdõ IV_LǞʼDÕ   ; !"mennä"
lǟʼdõ:lǟʼdõ V-AUX_LǞʼDÕ   ; !"täytyä"
maitõ:māitõ IV_AŖŠTÕ   ; !"pilaantua"
maņțõ:māņțõ TV_AŖŠTÕ   ; !"torjua"
meʼḑḑõ:meʼḑḑõ TV_RIʼDDÕ   ; !"metsästää"
muʼdžõ:muʼdžõ TV_MUʼDŽÕ   ; !"panna sekaisin"
muʼdžõ:muʼdžõ IV_MUʼDŽÕ   ; !"vilistä"
mängõ:mängõ IV_MÄNGÕ   ; !"leikkiä"
mõllõ:mõllõ IV_ARRÕ   ; !"riehua"
mȯistõ:mȯistõ TV_MȮISTÕ   ; !"osata"
nuttõ:nuttõ TV_VÕTTÕ   ; !"nimetä"
nǟʼdõ:nǟʼdõ TV_NǞʼDÕ   ; !"nähdä"
osāgõ:osāgõ IV_KŪLÕ   ; !"XX"
oudõ:ōdõ TV_OUDÕ   ; !"XX"
outõ:ōtõ TV_OUTÕ   ; !"XX"
pallõ:pǭla TV_PALLÕ   ; !"XX"
paʼggõ:paʼggõ IV_LUʼGGÕ   ; !"XX"
paʼllõ:paʼllõ IV_JEʼLLÕ   ; !"XX"
peizõ:peizõ IV_KEIJÕ   ; !"XX"
pieksõ:pieksõ TV_MAKSÕ   ; !"XX"
pieksõ:pieksõ IV_MAKSÕ   ; !"XX"
pretsõ:pretsõ IV_KUTSÕ   ; !"XX"
puʼļļõ:puʼļļõ TV_LUʼGGÕ   ; !"XX"
pānda:paʼnā TV_PĀNDA   ; !"panna"
pānda:paʼnā IV_PĀNDA   ; !"heittäytyä"
pānda:paʼnā V-AUX_PĀNDA   ; !"XX"
pūoldõ:pūoldõ TV_   ; !"XX"
pūʼgõ:pūʼgõ TV_AʼILÕ   ; !"XX"
pǟlõouŗõ:pǟlõ#ouŗõ IV_OUŖÕ   ; !"XX"
pȯigõ:pȯigõ IV_PȮIMÕ   ; !"XX"
pȯlgõ:pȯlgõ TV_PȮIMÕ   ; !"XX"
pȯrtõ:pūortõ TV_PȮRTÕ   ; !"XX"
pȯļļõ:pūoļõ IV_PȮĻĻÕ   ; !"XX"
pȯļțõ:pȯļțõ TV_PȮĻTÕ   ; !"XX"
rištõ:rištõ IV_VAKȚÕ   ; !"XX"
saʼddõ:saʼddõ IV_VIEʼDDÕ   ; !"XX"
seļţõ:seļţõ TV_LAITÕ   ; !"XX"
seļţõ:seļţõ IV_LAITÕ   ; !"XX"
sittõ:sittõ TV_KITTÕ   ; !"XX"
siʼddõ:siʼddõ TV_VIEʼDDÕ   ; !"XX"
skrõuvõ:skrõuvõ TV_KŪLÕ   ; !"XX"
smekkõ:smekkõ TV_AKKÕ   ; !"XX"
spitšõ:spitšõ TV_KUTSÕ   ; !"XX"
strempõ:strēmpõ TV_TUNDÕ   ; !"XX"
svaʼrrõ:svaʼrrõ TV_SVAʼRRÕ   ; !"XX"
sõʼvlõ:sõʼvlõ IV_AʼILÕ   ; !"XX"
sīedõ:sīedõ TV_SĪEDÕ   ; !"syödä"
sǭdõ:sǭdõ TV_SǬDÕ   ; !"saada"
sǭdõ:sǭdõ IV_SǬDÕ   ; !"päästä"
sǭdõ:sǭdõ V-AUX_SǬDÕ   ; !"voida"
tappõ:tappõ TV_TAPPÕ   ; !"XX"
tarmõ:tārmõ V-AUX_AIGÕ   ; !"XX"
teļļõ:teļõ TV_KUOŖŖÕ   ; !"XX"
tieudõ:tieudõ TV_TIEUDÕ   ; !"tietää"
tingõ:tingõ TV_ANDÕ   ; !"XX"
toņņõ:toņņõ TV_ARRÕ   ; !"XX"
täutõ:täutõ TV_TÄUTÕ   ; !"XX"
tīʼedõ:tīʼedõ TV_TĪʼEDÕ   ; !"tehdä"
tūodõ:tūo TV_JŪODÕ   ; !"tuoda"
tǭʼdõ:tǭʼdõ TV_TǬʼDÕ   ; !"XX"
ulztūlda:ulz#tuʼlā IV_TŪLDA   ; !"XX"
ulzvȯstõ:ulz#vȯstõ TV_ASTÕ   ; !"XX"
uskõ:uskõ TV_LASKÕ   ; !"XX"
uskõ:uskõ V-AUX_LASKÕ   ; !"XX"
vaŗŗõ:vǭŗõ TV_VANNÕ   ; !"XX"
vaʼllõ:vaʼllõ TV_JEʼLLÕ   ; !"XX"
vektõ:vektõ TV_VAKȚÕ   ; !"XX"
viettõ:viettõ IV_KITTÕ   ; !"XX"
vilkõ:vīlkõ IV_TUNDÕ   ; !"XX"
virgõ:vīrgõ IV_AIGÕ   ; !"herätä"
viskõ:viskõ IV_LASKÕ   ; !"XX"
võidõ:või V-AUX_VĪDÕ   ; !"voida"
võrkõ:vȭrkõ V-AUX_TUNDÕ   ; !"XX"
vīdõ:vī TV_VĪDÕ   ; !"viedä"
vȯidõ:vȯidõ IV_ANDÕ   ; !"XX"
vȯʼl:vȯʼl V-AUX_VȰLDA   ; !"XX"
vȱlda:vȱlda IV_VȰLDA   ; !"olla"
zingõ:zīngõ TV_AIGÕ   ; !"XX"
īedõ:īedõ IV_SĪEDÕ   ; !"jäädä"
īedõ:īedõ V-AUX_SĪEDÕ   ; !"jäädä"
ūdõ:ū IV_VĪDÕ   ; !"XX"
